Hawaii, session 2025, HB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, despite recent amendments to existing laws on coffee labeling and advertising, further amendments are necessary to avoid confusion regarding foreign-grown coffee that is processed within the State. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to support Hawaii's coffee growers by clarifying the existing laws on the labeling and advertising of certain coffee products and make necessary distinctions between the definitions of "geographic origin" and "regional origin". SECTION 2.  Section 486-120.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending its title and subsections (a) and (b) to read: "§486-120.6  Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffee; labeling or advertising requirements. (a)  In addition to all other labeling requirements, the identity statement used for labeling or advertising roasted coffee, instant coffee, or ready-to-drink coffee beverages produced in whole or in part from Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed green coffee beans shall meet the following requirements: (1)  For roasted coffee, instant coffee, or ready-to-drink coffee beverages that contain one hundred per cent Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffee by weight, the identity statement shall consist of either: (A)  One hundred per cent geographic origin.  The geographic origin of the Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffee, in coffee consisting of beans from only one geographic origin, followed by the word "Coffee"; provided that the geographic origin may be immediately preceded by the term "100%"; or (B)  Blend of geographic origins.  The per cent coffee by weight of one of the Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffees, used in coffee consisting of beans from several geographic origins, followed by the geographic origin of the weight-specified coffee and the terms "Coffee" and "All Hawaiian"; (2)  For roasted coffee, instant coffee, or ready-to-drink coffee beverages consisting of a blend of one or more Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffees, not less than the minimum per cent coffee by weight required under subsection (d)(2), and coffee not grown or processed in Hawaii, the per cent coffee by weight of one of the Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffees used in the blend, followed by the geographic origin of the weight-specified coffee and the term "Coffee Blend"; and (3)  Each word or character in the identity statement shall be of the same type size and shall be contiguous.  The smallest letter or character of the identity statement on packages of sixteen ounces or less net weight shall be at least one and one-half times the type size required under federal law for the statement of net weight or three-sixteenths of an inch in height, whichever is smaller.  The smallest letter or character of the identity statement on packages of greater than sixteen ounces net weight shall be at least one and one-half times the type size required under federal law for the statement of net weight.  The identity statement shall be conspicuously displayed without any intervening material in a position above the statement of net weight.  Upper and lower case letters may be used interchangeably in the identity statement. (b)  A listing of the geographic origins of the various Hawaii-grown and [Hawaii-processed] processed coffees and the regional origins of the various coffees not grown [or] and processed in Hawaii that are included in a blend under subsection (a)(2) shall be shown on the label.  This list shall consist of the term "Contains:", followed by, in descending order of per cent coffee by weight and separated by commas, the respective geographic origin or regional origin of the various coffees in the blend.  Each geographic origin or regional origin shall be preceded by the per cent coffee by weight represented by that geographic origin or regional origin, expressed as a number followed by the per cent sign.  In place of separate listings of regional origins of coffee not grown or processed in Hawaii in the blend, the list may include the words "Foreign-grown Coffee", preceded by the per cent coffee by weight in the blend. The type size used for this list shall be no less than half that of the identity statement.  This list shall appear below the identity statement on the front panel of the label." 2.  By amending subsection (g) to read: "(g)  As used in this section: "Geographic origin" means the geographic regions in which Hawaii-grown green coffee beans are produced, as defined in rules adopted under chapter 147; provided that the term "Hawaiian" may be substituted for the geographic origin "Hawaii". "Per cent coffee by weight" means the percentage calculated by dividing the weight in pounds of roasted green coffee beans of one geographic or regional origin used in a production run of roasted coffee, instant coffee, or ready-to-drink coffee beverages by the total weight in pounds of the roasted green coffee beans used in that production run of roasted coffee, instant coffee, or ready-to-drink coffee beverages, and multiplying the quotient by one hundred. "Ready-to-drink coffee beverage" means a prepackaged beverage that consists of or includes coffee and is sold in a prepared form that can be immediately consumed upon purchase.  "Ready-to-drink coffee beverage" does not include made-to-order beverages. "Regional origin" means any coffee growing region of the world, except those in the State, where green coffee beans are grown and processed." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________